Utah statutes.
53A-1-1105.   Criteria for determining school grades.

A school's grade shall be based on:

(1)  the proficiency of a school's students in language arts, mathematics, science, and writing as measured by statewide assessments;

(2)  learning gains of a school's students on statewide assessments of language arts, mathematics, and science achievement; and

(3)  for a high school:

(a)  the graduation rate; and

(b)  measures indicating college and career readiness.

